Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2075.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 39-1 of the General Laws entitled "Public Utilities Commission" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
39-1-33.1. Report on electrification.
The public utilities commission shall produce a report by January 1, 2027 and each January
1 thereafter, containing an analysis of the electric grid and its ability and/or capacity to handle the
electrification load needed to power cars, buildings, and heating of homes within the state. The
report shall be provided to the speaker of the house, the senate president, and the governor.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003270
========